ext/liblouis/tables/translation/_translation_da-g2.ctb
# letter v
word var 36
begword vea =
begword veb =
begword vec =
begword veden 3456-12346
begword veder 3456-23456
begword vedet 3456-2346
begword vede 3456-1456
word ved 1236
begword ved =
begword veen 3456-126
begword veer 3456-156
begword veet 3456-346
begword vee =
begword vef =
begword vege 3456-12456
begword veg 123456
begword vehvor 3456-2456
begword vehvor 3456-34
begword veig 1236-15-35
begword vei =
begword vejene 3456-245-15-1246
begword vej =
always vena 3456-1345-1
always venda 1236-126-145-1
always venden 1236-126-12346
always vender 1236-126-23456
always vendet 1236-126-2346
always vende 1236-126-1456
always vendigen 1236-126-145-24-1245-126
always vendiger 1236-126-145-24-1245-156
always vendiget 1236-126-145-24-1245-346
always vendige 1236-126-145-24-12456
always vendig 1236-126-145-35
always vendi 1236-126-145-24
always vendo 1236-126-145-135
always vendu 1236-126-145-136
always vendy 1236-126-145-13456
always vendæ 1236-126-145-345
always vendâ 1236-126-145-16
always vendâ 1236-126-145-345
always vendâ 1236-126-145-16
always vendæ 1236-126-145-345
always vendæ 1236-126-145-345
always vendö 1236-126-145-246
always vendø 1236-126-145-246
always vend 3456-12345
always venend 3456-1246-12345
always venene 3456-1246-1246
always venen 3456-1345-126
always venere 3456-1246-12356
always vener 3456-1345-156
always venete 3456-1246-1256
always venet 3456-1345-346
always vene 3456-1246
always ven 1236-126
always vera 3456-1235-1
always verdenskre 1236-156-12346-234-13-12356
always verdenskr 1236-156-12346-234-13-1235
always verend 3456-12356-12345
always verene 3456-12356-1246
always veren 3456-1235-126
always verere 3456-12356-12356
always verer 3456-1235-156
always verete 3456-12356-1256
always veret 3456-1235-346
always vere 3456-12356
always verige 3456-1235-24-12456
always verig 3456-1235-35
always veri 3456-1235-24
always verore 3456-1235-135-12356
always veror 3456-1235-1346
always vero 3456-1235-135
always veru 3456-1235-136
always very 3456-1235-13456
always veræ 3456-1235-345
always verâ 3456-1235-16
always verâ 3456-1235-345
always verâ 3456-1235-16
always veræ 3456-1235-345
always veræ 3456-1235-345
always verö 3456-1235-246
always verø 3456-1235-246
always ver 1236-156
always veta 3456-2345-1
always vetend 3456-1256-12345
always vetene 3456-1256-1246
always veten 3456-2345-126
always vetere 3456-1256-12356
always veter 3456-2345-156
always vetete 3456-1256-1256
always vetet 3456-2345-346
always vete 3456-1256
always vetige 3456-2345-24-12456
always vetig 3456-2345-35
always veti 3456-2345-24
always vetore 3456-2345-135-12356
always vetor 3456-2345-1346
always veto 3456-2345-135
always vetu 3456-2345-136
always vety 3456-2345-13456
always vetæ 3456-2345-345
always vetâ 3456-2345-16
always vetâ 3456-2345-345
always vetâ 3456-2345-16
always vetæ 3456-2345-345
always vetæ 3456-2345-345
always vetö 3456-2345-246
always vetø 3456-2345-246
always vet 1236-346
always ve 3456
word ville 1236-123-15
word vil 1236-123
word været 1236-2345
word være 345
word været 1236-2345
word være 345
